Hawaii, session 2026, SB2908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Simplifying Permitting for Enhanced Economic Development (SPEED) task force was established pursuant to Act 133, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025.  The SPEED task force brought together various state and county agencies and stakeholders to address issues related to obtaining permits for housing, infrastructure, and other projects.  The legislature further finds that the SPEED task force is responsible for identifying actions taken, challenges encountered, and legislative measures needed to facilitate, expedite, and coordinate state and intergovernmental permitting processes. In its initial phase, the SPEED task force split into three permitted interaction groups, each focused on a specific, high-impact segment of the permitting system.  The SPEED task force then submitted to the legislature a December 2025 final report of the permitted interaction groups, representing a combined report of the three permitted interaction groups, which outlined findings regarding existing actions and persistent challenges and presented initial recommendations for legislative and administrative measures to improve permitting processes statewide. The December 2025 final report identifies lengthy waiting times as a common issue in the permitting process and finds that applicants, staff, and the process itself share responsibility for these delays. However, a major delay in the process occurs before state and county personnel can even begin their substantive technical review, in the form of incomplete or incorrect submissions, misrouted applications, and poor quality plans.  The final report suggests that a digital system or intake portal could be used to prevent the submission of incomplete applications and standardize data across jurisdictions.  The legislature additionally finds that some counties have already begun to implement artificial intelligence tools as part of the application screening process to reduce repetitive tasks for staff while preserving professional judgement. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require and appropriate funds for the department of business, economic development, and tourism, in collaboration with a county selected by the department, to develop an artificial intelligence-assisted pre-compliance intake pilot platform for that county. SECTION 2.  (a) The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall develop, in collaboration with a county selected by the department, an artificial intelligence-assisted pre-compliance intake pilot platform for that county.  The pilot platform shall: (1)  Be limited to permitting intake and projects involving single-family homes; (2)  Utilize artificial intelligence to support the permit intake, routing, and review process; (3)  Screen applications for completeness, missing documentation, and inconsistencies; (4)  Enforce required fields at intake; (5)  Validate basic parcel and zoning information; (6)  Route applications concurrently to all relevant county agencies; (7)  Offer guidance to applicants through an applicant-facing chat and frequently asked questions resources; and (8)  Preserve the use of in-person assistance and phone support and ensure that any use of automation or artificial intelligence enhances, rather than replaces, human service. (b)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall develop a policy or metric to measure the success of the pilot platform to determine if such platforms are suitable for adoption by all counties. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to develop, in collaboration with the county selected by the department pursuant to section 2(a), an artificial intelligence-assisted pre-compliance intake pilot platform for that county; provided that no funds shall be made available under this Act unless the selected county provides matching funds in the sum of $          . The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.